Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202655-157.03
Adjutant General; establish program; incentive payments; purpose; restriction.

The Adjutant General may establish a program to encourage individuals to enlist or reenlist as enlisted persons or be commissioned or retained as commissioned officers in units of the Nebraska National Guard whenever the strength level of such units is so low as to adversely affect the ability of such units to meet their state or federal mission, so long as the cost of such program does not exceed the amount appropriated for such purpose. The Adjutant General may devise and change a formula to distribute incentive payments to members of the Army National Guard, the Air National Guard, or any other person designated under such program for the purpose of encouraging recruitment and retention of enlisted persons and officers.

Laws 1978, LB 564, § 4;

Laws 2024, LB895, § 1.